Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-924
Rules and regulations.

(1) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Privacy of Insurance Consumer Information Act.

(2) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish standards that licensees must meet in the development and implementation of administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of consumer and customer information.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 24;

Laws 2003, LB 216, § 6.